Hawaii statutes.
[§571-8.1] Qualifications; tenure; removal.
Each district family judge shall reside in the judicial circuit for which the
district family judge is appointed and shall have been an attorney licensed to
practice in all the courts of the State for at least five years. District
family judges shall hold office for a term of six years and until their
successors are appointed and qualified; provided that any district family judge
may be summarily removed from office, and the district family judge's commission
revoked by the supreme court whenever the supreme court deems such removal
necessary for the public good or the volume of cases within the circuit is
reduced to a level where the reduction of the number of district family judges
within a circuit is deemed advisable. [L 1973, c 219, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next